src/orthography/syllabics2latin.xfscript
! Script for syll to latin for Plains Cree, 
! or more general, for Western Cree

! Keyboard legend
! ᐊ  ᐸ  ᑕ  ᑲ  ᒐ  ᒪ  ᓇ  ᓴ  ᔭ
! a  pa ta ka ca ma na sa ya 

!  Rows: B = a, C = o, D = i, E = e
! Thus, key B01 = a, D08 = si, etc.



! with w

! Complex writing of dotted symbols

define cwaComposeRule [ ᒐ ᐧ ]  -> [ c w a ] ;
define cwiComposeRule [ ᒋ ᐧ ]   -> [ c w i ] ;
define cwoComposeRule [ ᒍ ᐧ ]   -> [ c w o ] ;
define cwâComposeRule [ ᒑ ᐧ ]   -> [ c w â ] ;
define cwêComposeRule [ ᒉ ᐧ ]   -> [ c w ê ] ;
define cwîComposeRule [ ᒌ ᐧ ]   -> [ c w î ] ;
define cwôComposeRule [ ᒎ ᐧ ]   -> [ c w ô ] ;
	
define kwaComposeRule [ ᑲ ᐧ ]   -> [ k w a ] ;
define kwiComposeRule [ ᑭ ᐧ ]   -> [ k w i ] ;
define kwoComposeRule [ ᑯ ᐧ ]   -> [ k w o ] ;
define kwâComposeRule [ ᑳ ᐧ ]   -> [ k w â ] ;
define kwêComposeRule [ ᑫ ᐧ ]   -> [ k w ê ] ;
define kwîComposeRule [ ᑮ ᐧ ]   -> [ k w î ] ;
define kwôComposeRule [ ᑰ ᐧ ]   -> [ k w ô ] ;
	
define mwaComposeRule [ ᒪ ᐧ ]   -> [ m w a ] ;
define mwiComposeRule [ ᒥ ᐧ ]   -> [ m w i ] ;
define mwoComposeRule [ ᒧ ᐧ ]   -> [ m w o ] ;
define mwâComposeRule [ ᒫ ᐧ ]   -> [ m w â ] ;
define mwêComposeRule [ ᒣ ᐧ ]   -> [ m w ê ] ;
define mwîComposeRule [ ᒦ ᐧ ]   -> [ m w î ] ;
define mwôComposeRule [ ᒨ ᐧ ]   -> [ m w ô ] ;
	
define nwaComposeRule [ ᓇ ᐧ ]   -> [ n w a ] ;
define nwiComposeRule [ ᓂ ᐧ ]   -> [ n w i ] ;
define nwoComposeRule [ ᓄ ᐧ ]   -> [ n w o ] ;
define nwâComposeRule [ ᓈ ᐧ ]   -> [ n w â ] ;
define nwêComposeRule [ ᓀ ᐧ ]   -> [ n w ê ] ;
define nwîComposeRule [ ᓃ ᐧ ]   -> [ n w î ] ;
define nwôComposeRule [ ᓅ ᐧ ]   -> [ n w ô ] ;
	
define pwaComposeRule [ ᐸ ᐧ ]   -> [ p w a ] ;
define pwiComposeRule [ ᐱ ᐧ ]   -> [ p w i ] ;
define pwoComposeRule [ ᐳ ᐧ ]   -> [ p w o ] ;
define pwâComposeRule [ ᐹ ᐧ ]   -> [ p w â ] ;
define pwêComposeRule [ ᐯ ᐧ ]   -> [ p w ê ] ;
define pwîComposeRule [ ᐲ ᐧ ]   -> [ p w î ] ;
define pwôComposeRule [ ᐴ ᐧ ]   -> [ p w ô ] ;
	
define swaComposeRule [ ᓴ ᐧ ]   -> [ s w a ] ;
define swiComposeRule [ ᓯ ᐧ ]   -> [ s w i ] ;
define swoComposeRule [ ᓱ ᐧ ]   -> [ s w o ] ;
define swâComposeRule [ ᓵ ᐧ ]   -> [ s w â ] ;
define swêComposeRule [ ᓭ ᐧ ]   -> [ s w ê ] ;
define swîComposeRule [ ᓰ ᐧ ]   -> [ s w î ] ;
define swôComposeRule [ ᓲ ᐧ ]   -> [ s w ô ] ;
	
define twaComposeRule [ ᑕ ᐧ ]   -> [ t w a ] ;
define twiComposeRule [ ᑎ ᐧ ]   -> [ t w i ] ;
define twoComposeRule [ ᑐ ᐧ ]   -> [ t w o ] ;
define twâComposeRule [ ᑖ ᐧ ]   -> [ t w â ] ;
define twêComposeRule [ ᑌ ᐧ ]   -> [ t w ê ] ;
define twîComposeRule [ ᑏ ᐧ ]   -> [ t w î ] ;
define twôComposeRule [ ᑑ ᐧ ]   -> [ t w ô ] ;
	
define ywaComposeRule [ ᔭ ᐧ ]   -> [ y w a ] ;
define ywiComposeRule [ ᔨ ᐧ ]   -> [ y w i ] ;
define ywoComposeRule [ ᔪ ᐧ ]   -> [ y w o ] ;
define ywâComposeRule [ ᔮ ᐧ ]   -> [ y w â ] ;
define ywêComposeRule [ ᔦ ᐧ ]   -> [ y w ê ] ;
define ywîComposeRule [ ᔩ ᐧ ]   -> [ y w î ] ;
define ywôComposeRule [ ᔫ ᐧ ]   -> [ y w ô ] ;
	
   define waComposeRule [ ᐊ ᐧ ]   -> [ w a ] ;
   define wiComposeRule [ ᐃ ᐧ ]   -> [ w i ] ;
   define woComposeRule [ ᐅ ᐧ ]   -> [ w o ] ;
   define wâComposeRule [ ᐋ ᐧ ]   -> [ w â ] ;
   define wêComposeRule [ ᐁ ᐧ ]   -> [ w ê ] ;
   define wîComposeRule [ ᐄ ᐧ ]   -> [ w î ] ;
   define wôComposeRule [ ᐆ ᐧ ]     -> [ w ô ] ;
		
	
	
! with w	th w
	
! 3	letter symbols
	
define cwaRule [ ᒝ ]   -> [ c w a ] ;
define cwiRule [ ᒕ ]   -> [ c w i ] ;
define cwoRule [ ᒙ ]   -> [ c w o ] ;
define cwâRule [ ᒟ ]   -> [ c w â ] ;
define cwêRule [ ᒓ ]   -> [ c w ê ] ;
define cwîRule [ ᒗ ]   -> [ c w î ] ;
define cwôRule [ ᒛ ]   -> [ c w ô ] ;
	
define kwaRule [ ᑿ ]   -> [ k w a ] ;
define kwiRule [ ᑷ ]   -> [ k w i ] ;
define kwoRule [ ᑻ ]   -> [ k w o ] ;
define kwâRule [ ᒁ ]   -> [ k w â ] ;
define kwêRule [ ᑵ ]   -> [ k w ê ] ;
define kwîRule [ ᑹ ]   -> [ k w î ] ;
define kwôRule [ ᑽ ]   -> [ k w ô ] ;
	
define mwaRule [ ᒷ ]   -> [ m w a ] ;
define mwiRule [ ᒯ ]   -> [ m w i ] ;
define mwoRule [ ᒳ ]   -> [ m w o ] ;
define mwâRule [ ᒹ ]   -> [ m w â ] ;
define mwêRule [ ᒭ ]   -> [ m w ê ] ;
define mwîRule [ ᒱ ]   -> [ m w î ] ;
define mwôRule [ ᒵ ]   -> [ m w ô ] ;
	
define nwaRule [ ᓌ ]   -> [ n w a ] ;
define nwiRule [ ᣇ ]   -> [ n w i ] ;
define nwoRule [ ᣋ ]   -> [ n w o ] ;
define nwâRule [ ᓎ ]   -> [ n w â ] ;
define nwêRule [ ᓊ ]   -> [ n w ê ] ;
define nwîRule [ ᣉ ]   -> [ n w î ] ;
define nwôRule [ ᣍ ]   -> [ n w ô ] ;
	
define pwaRule [ ᑅ ]   -> [ p w a ] ;
define pwiRule [ ᐽ ]   -> [ p w i ] ;
define pwoRule [ ᑁ ]   -> [ p w o ] ;
define pwâRule [ ᑇ ]   -> [ p w â ] ;
define pwêRule [ ᐻ ]   -> [ p w ê ] ;
define pwîRule [ ᐿ ]   -> [ p w î ] ;
define pwôRule [ ᑃ ]   -> [ p w ô ] ;
	
define swaRule [ ᔁ ]   -> [ s w a ] ;
define swiRule [ ᓹ ]   -> [ s w i ] ;
define swoRule [ ᓽ ]   -> [ s w o ] ;
define swâRule [ ᔃ ]   -> [ s w â ] ;
define swêRule [ ᓷ ]   -> [ s w ê ] ;
define swîRule [ ᓻ ]   -> [ s w î ] ;
define swôRule [ ᓿ ]   -> [ s w ô ] ;
	
define twaRule [ ᑢ ]   -> [ t w a ] ;
define twiRule [ ᑚ ]   -> [ t w i ] ;
define twoRule [ ᑞ ]   -> [ t w o ] ;
define twâRule [ ᑤ ]   -> [ t w â ] ;
define twêRule [ ᑘ ]   -> [ t w ê ] ;
define twîRule [ ᑜ ]   -> [ t w î ] ;
define twôRule [ ᑠ ]   -> [ t w ô ] ;
	
define ywaRule [ ᔺ ]   -> [ y w a ] ;
define ywiRule [ ᔲ ]   -> [ y w i ] ;
define ywoRule [ ᔶ ]   -> [ y w o ] ;
define ywâRule [ ᔼ ]   -> [ y w â ] ;
define ywêRule [ ᔰ ]   -> [ y w ê ] ;
define ywîRule [ ᔴ ]   -> [ y w î ] ;
define ywôRule [ ᔸ ]   -> [ y w ô ] ;
	
	
define waRule [ ᐘ ]	 -> [ w a ] ;
define wiRule [ ᐏ ]	 -> [ w i ] ;
define woRule [ ᐓ ]	 -> [ w o ] ;
define wâRule [ ᐚ ] -> [ w â ] ;
define wêRule [ ᐍ ]	 -> [ w ê ] ;
define wîRule [ ᐑ ]	 -> [ w î ] ;
define wôRule [ ᐕ ]	 -> [ w ô ] ;
	
	
! Without w	thout w
! two	o-letter symbols
	
define caRule [ ᒐ ]   -> [ c a ] ;
define ciRule [ ᒋ ]   -> [ c i ] ;
define coRule [ ᒍ ]   -> [ c o ] ;
define câRule [ ᒑ ]   -> [ c â ] ;
define cêRule [ ᒉ ]   -> [ c ê ] ;
define cîRule [ ᒌ ]   -> [ c î ] ;
define côRule [ ᒎ ]   -> [ c ô ] ;
	
define kaRule [ ᑲ ]   -> [ k a ] ;
define kiRule [ ᑭ ]   -> [ k i ] ;
define koRule [ ᑯ ]   -> [ k o ] ;
define kâRule [ ᑳ ]   -> [ k â ] ;
define kêRule [ ᑫ ]   -> [ k ê ] ;
define kîRule [ ᑮ ]   -> [ k î ] ;
define kôRule [ ᑰ ]   -> [ k ô ] ;
	
define maRule [ ᒪ ]   -> [ m a ] ;
define miRule [ ᒥ ]   -> [ m i ] ;
define moRule [ ᒧ ]   -> [ m o ] ;
define mâRule [ ᒫ ]   -> [ m â ] ;
define mêRule [ ᒣ ]   -> [ m ê ] ;
define mîRule [ ᒦ ]   -> [ m î ] ;
define môRule [ ᒨ ]   -> [ m ô ] ;
	
define naRule [ ᓇ ]   -> [ n a ] ;
define niRule [ ᓂ ]   -> [ n i ] ;
define noRule [ ᓄ ]   -> [ n o ] ;
define nâRule [ ᓈ ]   -> [ n â ] ;
define nêRule [ ᓀ ]   -> [ n ê ] ;
define nîRule [ ᓃ ]   -> [ n î ] ;
define nôRule [ ᓅ ]   -> [ n ô ] ;
	
define paRule [ ᐸ ]   -> [ p a ] ;
define piRule [ ᐱ ]   -> [ p i ] ;
define poRule [ ᐳ ]   -> [ p o ] ;
define pâRule [ ᐹ ]   -> [ p â ] ;
define pêRule [ ᐯ ]   -> [ p ê ] ;
define pîRule [ ᐲ ]   -> [ p î ] ;
define pôRule [ ᐴ ]   -> [ p ô ] ;
	
define saRule [ ᓴ ]   -> [ s a ] ;
define siRule [ ᓯ ]   -> [ s i ] ;
define soRule [ ᓱ ]   -> [ s o ] ;
define sâRule [ ᓵ ]   -> [ s â ] ;
define sêRule [ ᓭ ]   -> [ s ê ] ;
define sîRule [ ᓰ ]   -> [ s î ] ;
define sôRule [ ᓲ ]   -> [ s ô ] ;

define taRule [ ᑕ ]   -> [ t a ] ;
define tiRule [ ᑎ ]   -> [ t i ] ;
define toRule [ ᑐ ]   -> [ t o ] ;
define tâRule [ ᑖ ]   -> [ t â ] ;
define têRule [ ᑌ ]   -> [ t ê ] ;
define tîRule [ ᑏ ]   -> [ t î ] ;
define tôRule [ ᑑ ]   -> [ t ô ] ;
	
define yaRule [ ᔭ ]   -> [ y a ] ;
define yiRule [ ᔨ ]   -> [ y i ] ;
define yoRule [ ᔪ ]   -> [ y o ] ;
define yâRule [ ᔮ ]   -> [ y â ] ;
define yêRule [ ᔦ ]   -> [ y ê ] ;
define yîRule [ ᔩ ]   -> [ y î ] ;
define yôRule [ ᔫ ]   -> [ y ô ] ;
	
define hkRule [ ᕽ ]   -> [ h k ] ;
	
	
! one	e-letter symbols
	
define aRule [ ᐊ ]   -> [ a ] ;
define iRule [ ᐃ ]   -> [ i ] ;
define oRule [ ᐅ ]   -> [ o ] ;
define âRule [ ᐋ ]   -> [ â ] ;
define êRule [ ᐁ ]   -> [ ê ] ;
define îRule [ ᐄ ]   -> [ î ] ;
define ôRule [ ᐆ ]     -> [ ô ] ;
 	
define cRule [ ᐨ ]  -> [ c ] ;
define hRule [ ᐦ ]  -> [ h ] ;
define kRule [ ᐠ ]  -> [ k ] ;
define mRule [ ᒼ ]  -> [ m ] ;
define nRule [ ᐣ ]  -> [ n ] ;
define pRule [ ᑊ ]  -> [ p ] ;
define sRule [ ᐢ ]  -> [ s ] ;
define tRule [ ᐟ ]  -> [ t ] ;
define wRule [ ᐤ ]  -> [ w ] ;
define yRule [ ᕀ ]  -> [ y ] ;
	
	
define lRule [ ᓬ ]  -> [ l ] ;
define rRule [ ᕒ ]   -> [ r ] ;
define FullStopRule [ ᙮ ] -> [ %. ] ;



 
read regex [ cwaComposeRule 
.o. cwiComposeRule 
.o. cwoComposeRule 
.o. cwâComposeRule 
.o. cwêComposeRule 
.o. cwîComposeRule 
.o. cwôComposeRule 

.o. kwaComposeRule 
.o. kwiComposeRule 
.o. kwoComposeRule 
.o. kwâComposeRule 
.o. kwêComposeRule 
.o. kwîComposeRule 
.o. kwôComposeRule 

.o. mwaComposeRule 
.o. mwiComposeRule 
.o. mwoComposeRule 
.o. mwâComposeRule 
.o. mwêComposeRule 
.o. mwîComposeRule 
.o. mwôComposeRule 

.o. nwaComposeRule 
.o. nwiComposeRule 
.o. nwoComposeRule 
.o. nwâComposeRule 
.o. nwêComposeRule 
.o. nwîComposeRule 
.o. nwôComposeRule 

.o. pwaComposeRule 
.o. pwiComposeRule 
.o. pwoComposeRule 
.o. pwâComposeRule 
.o. pwêComposeRule 
.o. pwîComposeRule 
.o. pwôComposeRule 

.o. swaComposeRule 
.o. swiComposeRule 
.o. swoComposeRule 
.o. swâComposeRule 
.o. swêComposeRule 
.o. swîComposeRule 
.o. swôComposeRule 

.o. twaComposeRule 
.o. twiComposeRule 
.o. twoComposeRule 
.o. twâComposeRule 
.o. twêComposeRule 
.o. twîComposeRule 
.o. twôComposeRule 

.o. ywaComposeRule 
.o. ywiComposeRule 
.o. ywoComposeRule 
.o. ywâComposeRule 
.o. ywêComposeRule 
.o. ywîComposeRule 
.o. ywôComposeRule 

.o. waComposeRule
.o. wiComposeRule
.o. woComposeRule
.o. wâComposeRule
.o. wêComposeRule
.o. wîComposeRule
.o. wôComposeRule

.o. cwaRule
.o. cwiRule
.o. cwoRule
.o. cwâRule
.o. cwêRule
.o. cwîRule
.o. cwôRule

.o. kwaRule
.o. kwiRule
.o. kwoRule
.o. kwâRule
.o. kwêRule
.o. kwîRule
.o. kwôRule

.o. mwaRule
.o. mwiRule
.o. mwoRule
.o. mwâRule
.o. mwêRule
.o. mwîRule
.o. mwôRule

.o. nwaRule
.o. nwiRule
.o. nwoRule
.o. nwâRule
.o. nwêRule
.o. nwîRule
.o. nwôRule

.o. pwaRule
.o. pwiRule
.o. pwoRule
.o. pwâRule
.o. pwêRule
.o. pwîRule
.o. pwôRule

.o. swaRule
.o. swiRule
.o. swoRule
.o. swâRule
.o. swêRule
.o. swîRule
.o. swôRule

.o. twaRule
.o. twiRule
.o. twoRule
.o. twâRule
.o. twêRule
.o. twîRule
.o. twôRule

.o. ywaRule
.o. ywiRule
.o. ywoRule
.o. ywâRule
.o. ywêRule
.o. ywîRule
.o. ywôRule


.o. caRule
.o. ciRule
.o. coRule
.o. câRule
.o. cêRule
.o. cîRule
.o. côRule

.o. kaRule
.o. kiRule
.o. koRule
.o. kâRule
.o. kêRule
.o. kîRule
.o. kôRule

.o. maRule
.o. miRule
.o. moRule
.o. mâRule
.o. mêRule
.o. mîRule
.o. môRule

.o. naRule
.o. niRule
.o. noRule
.o. nâRule
.o. nêRule
.o. nîRule
.o. nôRule

.o. paRule
.o. piRule
.o. poRule
.o. pâRule
.o. pêRule
.o. pîRule
.o. pôRule

.o. saRule
.o. siRule
.o. soRule
.o. sâRule
.o. sêRule
.o. sîRule
.o. sôRule

.o. taRule
.o. tiRule
.o. toRule
.o. tâRule
.o. têRule
.o. tîRule
.o. tôRule

.o. waRule
.o. wiRule
.o. woRule
.o. wâRule
.o. wêRule
.o. wîRule
.o. wôRule

.o. yaRule
.o. yiRule
.o. yoRule
.o. yâRule
.o. yêRule
.o. yîRule
.o. yôRule

.o. hkRule

.o. aRule 
.o. iRule 
.o. oRule 
.o. âRule 
.o. êRule 
.o. îRule 
.o. ôRule 

.o. cRule 
.o. hRule 
.o. kRule 
.o. mRule 
.o. nRule 
.o. pRule 
.o. sRule 
.o. tRule 
.o. wRule 
.o. yRule

.o. lRule 
.o. rRule 

.o. FullStopRule ] ; 
 
invert net
